Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. Federal Funds

§ 41.
Authority of Agency to use federal funds to aid education.

The Agency of Education is designated as the sole state agency to establish and administer any statewide plan required as a condition for receipt of federal funds made available to the State for any educational purposes, including career technical education and adult education and literacy. The Agency shall also be the agency to accept and administer federal funds that require administration by a state education agency having jurisdiction of elementary and secondary education.

Subject to the approval of the Governor, the Agency may accept and use federal funds. It may establish criteria and procedures to conform with any requirements established for the use of the funds and may take such other action as may be required to comply with any condition for receipt of federal aid.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 19; amended

1975, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2009, No. 44

, § 29, eff. May 21, 2009;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 17, 302, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 42.
Acceptance, distribution, and accounting of federal funds.

The State Treasurer, acting upon the order of the Secretary, shall accept, distribute, and account for federal funds available for use by the Agency. Funds shall be distributed and accounted for by the State Treasurer in accordance with the laws of Vermont, but if there is a conflict between those laws and the laws or regulations of the United States, then federal law shall apply. The Secretary shall prepare and submit federally required statements of funds received and disbursed. The Secretary shall cause an audit to be made of the federal funds and shall submit a copy of the audit as required by federal law. The audit shall be supported by any reports from the supervisory union, local school districts, or other recipients of federal funds as may be required by the Secretary or the federal government.

The State Treasurer may directly deposit checks payable to a supervisory union or any school district within it or may deliver checks to the superintendent of the supervisory union.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 20; amended

1987, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 43.
Federal education aid funds; administration; local education agency.

The Agency, as sole state agency, may administer federal funds made available to the State under the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, Public L. No. 89-10, as amended, and the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, Public L. No. 107-110. Those funds may be accepted and shall be distributed and accounted for by the State Treasurer in accordance with that law and rules and regulations of the United States issued under it if there is conflict between that law or those rules and regulations and the laws of this State.

For purposes of distribution of funds under this section, a supervisory union shall be a local education agency as that term is defined in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(26).

For purposes of determining student performance and application of consequences for failure to meet standards and for provision of compensatory and remedial services pursuant to 20 U.S.C. §§ 6311-6318, a supervisory union shall be a local education agency.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 190

, eff. June 30, 1965; amended

2003, No. 64

, § 1;

2003, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 46

, § 42, eff. July 1, 2016.

§ 44.
Federal funds; school food programs.

The Agency is authorized to accept and use federal funds made available to the State for school food programs under the National School Lunch Act, the Child Nutrition Act, and any amendments to those laws.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 23; amended

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.